Hawaii statutes.
[§353D-8] Other provisions. Nothing in
this chapter is intended to limit the department in developing additional
programs or making all reasonable efforts to promote services to families of
offenders under its jurisdiction. [L 1987, c 251, pt of §1]

Revision Note

"Chapter" substituted for "part" pursuant
to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next